Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-626
Record, defined.

Record means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 388.